Illinois, session 104th, SB3249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-27 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-27)7    Sec. 6z-27. All moneys in the Audit Expense Fund shall be 8transferred, appropriated and used only for the purposes 9authorized by, and subject to the limitations and conditions 10prescribed by, the Illinois State Auditing Act.11    Within 30 days after July 1, 2026 2025, or as soon 12thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller shall order 13transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer from the 14following funds moneys in the specified amounts for deposit 15into the Audit Expense Fund: 16Attorney General Court Ordered and Voluntary 17    Compliance Payment Projects Fund..................$28,768 18Aggregate Operations Regulatory Fund.....................$876 19Agricultural Premium Fund.............................$21,729 20Attorney General's State Projects and 21    Court Ordered Distribution Fund...................$43,967 22Anna Veterans Home Fund................................$2,708 23Appraisal Administration Fund..........................$3,248   SB3249- 2 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Attorney General Whistleblower Reward 2    and Protection Fund..................................$855 3Bank and Trust Company Fund...........................$73,719 4Cannabis Business Development Fund.....................$1,524 5Cannabis Expungement Fund..............................$2,0226Capital Development Board 7    Revolving Fund.....................................$8,9168Cemetery Oversight Licensing and 9    Disciplinary Fund..................................$5,310 10Chicago State University Education 11    Improvement Fund..................................$16,852 12Clean Air Act Permit Fund.............................$12,095 13Coal Technology Development 14    Assistance Fund...................................$17,367 15Commitment to Human Services Fund....................$170,583 16Common School Fund...................................$391,650 17Community Water Supply Laboratory Fund...................$578 18Credit Union Fund.....................................$15,356 19DCFS Children's Services Fund........................$257,195 20Department of Corrections Reimbursement 21    and Education Fund................................$16,61422Design Professionals Administration23    and Investigation Fund.............................$4,28724Division of Real Estate General Fund...................$5,29425Department of Juvenile Justice 26    Reimbursement and Education Fund...................$4,354  SB3249- 3 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Downstate Mass Transportation Capital 2    Improvement Fund...................................$1,3753Downstate Public Transportation Fund..................$24,1274Downstate Transit Improvement Fund.......................$5105Drivers Education Fund...................................$6196Drycleaner Environmental Response7    Trust Fund.........................................$1,1648Education Assistance Fund..........................$2,413,5079Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund...........................$9,92510Energy Transition Assistance Fund.....................$23,30511Environmental Protection Permit and12    Inspection Fund....................................$7,08013Facilities Management Revolving Fund..................$11,96214Fair and Exposition Fund.................................$87615Federal High Speed Rail Trust Fund.....................$1,53116Federal Workforce Training Fund.......................$56,92017Feed Control Fund......................................$1,66818Fertilizer Control Fund................................$1,13919Fire Prevention Fund...................................$5,25420Fund for the Advancement of Education.................$70,56621Fund for Illinois' Future.............................$26,05522General Professions Dedicated Fund....................$32,75623General Revenue Fund..............................$17,653,15324Grade Crossing Protection Fund.........................$4,03725Hazardous Waste Fund...................................$3,90926Historic Property Administrative Fund..................$1,027  SB3249- 4 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Horse Racing Fund....................................$205,4832Illinois Charity Bureau Fund...........................$2,2313Illinois Clean Water Fund.............................$12,5154Illinois Forestry Development Fund....................$14,2025Illinois Gaming Law Enforcement Fund...................$1,2856Illinois Health Benefits Exchange Fund................$45,2917IMSA Income Fund.......................................$6,3638Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund.................$73,6599Illinois State Dental Disciplinary Fund................$5,45410Illinois State Fair Fund...............................$9,78711Illinois State Medical Disciplinary Fund..............$38,12912Illinois State Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund..............$8,05013Illinois Student Assistance Commission14    Contracts and Grants Fund..........................$4,54715Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund......................$3,74516Illinois Veterans' Homes Fund..........................$2,11217Illinois Wildlife Preservation Fund....................$1,28618Illinois Works Fund....................................$4,36819Income Tax Refund Fund...............................$132,57020Insurance Financial Regulation Fund..................$113,68421Insurance Premium Tax Refund Fund.....................$10,19922Insurance Producer Administration Fund...............$133,25323International Tourism Fund.............................$1,56424Large Business Attraction Fund........................$29,98325LaSalle Veterans Home Fund............................$12,38326Law Enforcement Recruitment and  SB3249- 5 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1    Retention Fund....................................$49,8112Law Enforcement Training Fund........................$194,4683Local Government Distributive Fund....................$97,8934Local Tourism Fund.....................................$7,8725Long Term Care Ombudsman Fund............................$6536Manteno Veterans Home Fund............................$31,6077Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund.....................$8078Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund...................$1,0859Motor Fuel Tax Fund...................................$74,47510Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund...............$16,59211Open Space Lands Acquisition12    and Development Fund..............................$98,92613Optometric Licensing and Disciplinary14    Board Fund.........................................$3,00215Parity Advancement Fund................................$4,53116Partners for Conservation Fund........................$21,66517Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund................$97,89318Pesticide Control Fund.................................$6,36219Professional Services Fund.............................$2,76020Professions Indirect Cost Fund........................$89,11121Public Pension Regulation Fund.........................$3,04522Public Transportation Fund............................$61,10023Quincy Veterans Home Fund.............................$45,48024Real Estate License Administration Fund...............$17,84525Real Estate Research and Education Fund..................$64326Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund........................$16,976  SB3249- 6 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Registered Certified Public Accountants'2    Administration and Disciplinary Fund...............$5,8953Renewable Energy Resources Trust Fund..................$1,3924Residential Finance Regulatory Fund...................$19,4435Road Fund............................................$379,7826Regional Transportation Authority Occupation7    and Use Tax Replacement Fund.......................$1,7988Savings Bank Regulatory Fund.............................$5349School Infrastructure Fund.............................$7,15810State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund...........$20,81711Solid Waste Management Fund...........................$13,18812Sound-Reducing Window and Doors13    Replacement Fund.....................................$72414Sports Wagering Fund..................................$11,51815State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund.......$6,98816State Police Training and Academy Fund.................$2,93317State and Local Sales Tax Reform Fund..................$3,14818State Asset Forfeiture Fund............................$1,15319State Aviation Program Fund............................$2,47220State Construction Account Fund.......................$97,56121State Crime Laboratory Fund............................$8,12122State Gaming Fund....................................$176,88223State Garage Revolving Fund............................$3,03924State Lottery Fund...................................$120,03025State Pensions Fund..................................$500,00026State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund....................$815  SB3249- 7 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1State Police Firearm Services Fund.....................$4,3202State Police Services Fund............................$21,6883State Police Vehicle Fund..............................$4,3414State Police Whistleblower Reward and5    Protection Fund....................................$2,8796State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's7    County Fund.......................................$12,4788Subtitle D Management Fund.............................$1,5069Supplemental Low-Income Energy10    Assistance Fund...................................$40,49311Tax Compliance and Administration Fund.................$4,17012Technology Management Revolving Fund.................$475,67813Tourism Promotion Fund................................$39,95914Traffic and Criminal Conviction Surcharge Fund........$81,75915Underground Storage Tank Fund.........................$22,45816Vehicle Inspection Fund...............................$15,46717Violent Crime Victims Assistance Fund..................$6,56118Weights and Measures Fund..............................$6,39219Workforce, Technology, and Economic20    Development Fund...................................$4,444 21Academic Quality Assurance Fund..........................$940 22African-American HIV/AIDS Response Fund................$4,266 23Agricultural Premium Fund............................$169,467 24Alzheimer's Awareness Fund.............................$1,068 25Alzheimer's Disease Research,26    Care, and Support Fund...............................$502   SB3249- 8 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Amusement Ride and Patron Safety Fund..................$6,888 2Assisted Living and Shared3    Housing Regulatory Fund............................$4,011 4Board of Higher Education State5    Contracts and Grants Fund.........................$13,416 6Capital Development Board Revolving Fund..............$10,7117Care Provider Fund for Persons with8    a Developmental Disability.........................$9,7719CDLIS/AAMVA/NMVTIS Trust Fund..........................$3,43310Chicago State University Education11    Improvement Fund..................................$15,774 12Child Labor and Day and Temporary13    Labor Services Enforcement Fund...................$15,414 14Child Support Administrative Fund......................$3,739 15Coal Technology Development16    Assistance Fund....................................$3,019 17Common School Fund...................................$246,578 18Community Mental Health19    Medicaid Trust Fund...............................$10,597 20Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund..................$1,700 21Death Certificate Surcharge Fund.......................$1,550 22Death Penalty Abolition Fund...........................$2,688 23Department of Business Services24    Special Operations Fund...........................$10,406 25Department of Human Services26    Community Services Fund...........................$15,086   SB3249- 9 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Dram Shop Fund.......................................$212,500 2Driver Services Administration Fund......................$937 3Drug Rebate Fund......................................$54,214 4Drug Treatment Fund....................................$1,236 5Education Assistance Fund..........................$2,193,017 6Emergency Planning and Training Fund.....................$528 7Emergency Public Health Fund...........................$8,769 8Employee Classification Fund.............................$967 9EMS Assistance Fund....................................$1,150 10Estate Tax Refund Fund.................................$1,628 11Facilities Management Revolving Fund..................$35,073 12Facility Licensing Fund................................$6,082 13Fair and Exposition Fund...............................$6,903 14Federal Financing Cost15    Reimbursement Fund.................................$7,100 16Feed Control Fund.....................................$13,874 17Fertilizer Control Fund................................$9,357 18Fire Prevention Fund...................................$4,282 19General Assembly Technology Fund.......................$2,830 20General Professions Dedicated Fund.....................$4,131 21General Revenue Fund..............................$17,653,153 22Governor's Administrative Fund.........................$5,956 23Governor's Grant Fund..................................$3,164 24Grant Accountability and Transparency Fund.............$1,041 25Guardianship and Advocacy Fund........................$16,432 26Health Facility Plan Review Fund.......................$2,286   SB3249- 10 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Health and Human Services2    Medicaid Trust Fund...............................$10,902 3Healthcare Provider Relief Fund......................$321,428 4Home Care Services Agency Licensure Fund...............$2,843 5Hospital Licensure Fund................................$1,251 6Hospital Provider Fund................................$99,530 7Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund................$19,809 8Illinois Community College Board9    Contracts and Grants Fund.........................$14,687 10Illinois Health Facilities Planning Fund...............$3,155 11Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Fund...............$11,636 12IMSA Income Fund.......................................$6,805 13Illinois School Asbestos Abatement Fund................$1,141 14Illinois State Fair Fund..............................$69,621 15Illinois Telecommunications Access16    Corporation Fund...................................$1,546 17Illinois Underground Utility18    Facilities Damage Prevention Fund.................$12,035 19Illinois Veterans' Rehabilitation Fund.................$1,103 20Illinois Workers' Compensation21    Commission Operations Fund.......................$241,658 22Industrial Hemp Regulatory Fund........................$1,407 23Interpreters for the Deaf Fund.........................$8,657 24Lead Poisoning Screening, Prevention,25    and Abatement Fund................................$19,789 26Lobbyist Registration Administration Fund................$843   SB3249- 11 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Long Term Care Monitor/Receiver Fund..................$42,485 2Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........................$20,620 3Low-Level Radioactive Waste Facility4    Development and Operation Fund.....................$2,402 5Mandatory Arbitration Fund.............................$2,635 6Mental Health Fund.....................................$5,353 7Mental Health Reporting Fund...........................$1,226 8Metabolic Screening and Treatment Fund................$46,885 9Monitoring Device Driving Permit10    Administration Fee Fund............................$1,475 11Motor Fuel Tax Fund....................................$1,068 12Motor Vehicle License Plate Fund......................$13,927 13Multiple Sclerosis Research Fund.........................$961 14Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund............$87,774 15Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund..................$595 16Partners For Conservation Fund.......................$117,108 17Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund...............$218,128 18Pesticide Control Fund................................$42,146 19Plumbing Licensure and Program Fund....................$3,672 20Private Business and Vocational Schools21    Quality Assurance Fund...............................$867 22Professional Services Fund............................$90,610 23Public Defender Fund...................................$6,198 24Public Health Laboratory25    Services Revolving Fund............................$1,098 26Public Utility Fund..................................$282,488   SB3249- 12 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1Radiation Protection Fund.............................$37,946 2Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund........................$58,858 3Rental Housing Support Program Fund....................$4,083 4Road Fund.............................................$55,409 5Secretary Of State DUI Administration Fund.............$2,767 6Secretary Of State Identification Security7    and Theft Prevention Fund.........................$16,793 8Secretary Of State Special License Plate Fund.........$3,473 9Secretary Of State Special Services Fund.............$26,832 10Securities Audit and Enforcement Fund..................$4,889 11Serve Illinois Commission Fund.........................$1,803 12Special Education Medicaid Matching Fund..............$4,329 13State Gaming Fund......................................$1,997 14State Garage Revolving Fund............................$7,501 15State Lottery Fund...................................$311,489 16State Pensions Fund..................................$500,000 17State Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund...............$752 18Supreme Court Special Purposes Fund....................$4,184 19Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment20    Registration Fund..................................$1,166 21Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund.....................$143,143 22Tourism Promotion Fund................................$79,695 23Transportation Regulatory Fund.......................$108,481 24Trauma Center Fund.....................................$1,872 25University Of Illinois Hospital Services Fund..........$5,476 26Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention and  SB3249- 13 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1    Insurance Verification Trust Fund..................$9,331 2Vehicle Inspection Fund................................$2,786 3Weights and Measures Fund.............................$24,640 4    Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, 5the General Assembly hereby authorizes the use of such funds 6for the purposes set forth in this Section.7    These provisions do not apply to funds classified by the 8Comptroller as federal trust funds or State trust funds. The 9Audit Expense Fund may receive transfers from those trust 10funds only as directed herein, except where prohibited by the 11terms of the trust fund agreement. The Auditor General shall 12notify the trustees of those funds of the estimated cost of the 13audit to be incurred under the Illinois State Auditing Act for 14the fund. The trustees of those funds shall direct the State 15Comptroller and Treasurer to transfer the estimated amount to 16the Audit Expense Fund.17    The Auditor General may bill entities that are not subject 18to the above transfer provisions, including private entities, 19related organizations and entities whose funds are locally 20held, for the cost of audits, studies, and investigations 21incurred on their behalf. Any revenues received under this 22provision shall be deposited into the Audit Expense Fund.23    In the event that moneys on deposit in any fund are 24unavailable, by reason of deficiency or any other reason 25preventing their lawful transfer, the State Comptroller shall 26order transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer the   SB3249- 14 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b1amount deficient or otherwise unavailable from the General 2Revenue Fund for deposit into the Audit Expense Fund.3    On or before December 1, 1992, and each December 1 4thereafter, the Auditor General shall notify the Governor's 5Office of Management and Budget (formerly Bureau of the 6Budget) of the amount estimated to be necessary to pay for 7audits, studies, and investigations in accordance with the 8Illinois State Auditing Act during the next succeeding fiscal 9year for each State fund for which a transfer or reimbursement 10is anticipated.11    Beginning with fiscal year 1994 and during each fiscal 12year thereafter, the Auditor General may direct the State 13Comptroller and Treasurer to transfer moneys from funds 14authorized by the General Assembly for that fund. In the event 15funds, including federal and State trust funds but excluding 16the General Revenue Fund, are transferred, during fiscal year 171994 and during each fiscal year thereafter, in excess of the 18amount to pay actual costs attributable to audits, studies, 19and investigations as permitted or required by the Illinois 20State Auditing Act or specific action of the General Assembly, 21the Auditor General shall, on September 30, or as soon 22thereafter as is practicable, direct the State Comptroller and 23Treasurer to transfer the excess amount back to the fund from 24which it was originally transferred.25(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-129, eff. 6-30-23; 26103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-453, eff.   SB3249- 15 -LRB104 17092 TRT 30511 b112-12-25.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.